Tennessee statutes. Title 48 Securities, Corporations And Associations
Part 1 Tennessee Securities Act of 1980
48-1-116. Rules, forms, orders, and hearings.

The commissioner may from time to time make, promulgate, amend, and rescind such rules, forms, and orders as are necessary to carry out this part, including rules, forms, and orders governing registration statements, applications, reports, and filing fees, and defining any terms, whether or not used in this part, insofar as the definitions are not inconsistent with this part. For the purpose of rules and forms, the commissioner may classify securities, persons, and matters within the commissioner's jurisdiction, and prescribe different requirements for different classes.

No rule, form, or order may be made, promulgated, amended, or rescinded unless the commissioner finds that the action is in the public interest, necessary for the protection of investors and consistent with the purposes fairly intended by the policy and provisions of this part. In prescribing rules and forms, the commissioner may cooperate with the securities administrators of other jurisdictions, the securities and exchange commission, or any national securities exchange or national securities association registered under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 (15 U.S.C. § 78a et seq.), as amended, with a view to effectuating the policy of this part to achieve maximum uniformity in the form and content of registration statements, applications, and reports wherever practicable.

The commissioner may by rule prescribe:

The form and content of financial statements required under this part;

The circumstances under which consolidated financial statements shall be filed; and

Whether or not any required financial statements shall be certified by independent or certified public accountants.

All financial statements shall be prepared in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles or the rules adopted by the securities and exchange commission.

No provision of this part imposing any liability applies to any act done or omitted in good faith in conformity with any rule, form, order, or interpretive opinion under § 48-1-117(e), of the commissioner, notwithstanding that the rule, form, or order may later be amended or rescinded or be determined by judicial or other authority to be invalid for any reason.

All rules and forms provided for in this part shall be adopted, promulgated, and contested as provided in the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

No order may be entered under this part (except routine orders of effective registration, registration termination by operation of law, or registration abandonment) without:

Notice to the affected parties (which shall be prior notice unless the commissioner determines that prior notice would not be in the public interest and would be detrimental to the protection of investors);

Opportunity for a hearing before the commissioner; and

Written findings of fact and conclusions of law.

Every investigation, hearing or other proceeding (other than private investigations under § 48-1-118(a)) held under this part which determines or affects the legal rights, duties, or privileges of particular specified parties shall be deemed to be a “contested case” under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, and shall be conducted as required by that act.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 16; T.C.A., § 48-16-116; T.C.A. § 48-2-116; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 40.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-116 was transferred to § 48-1-116 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2001, ch. 61, § 1 provided that the act shall be cited as “The Securities Omnibus Act of 2001.”

48-1-117. Administrative files and opinions.

A document is filed when it is received by the commissioner.

The commissioner shall keep a register of all applications for registration and registration statements which are or have ever been declared effective under this part and all denial, suspension, or revocation orders which have ever been entered under this part. The register shall be open for public inspection during the commissioner's normal business hours.

The information contained in or filed with any registration statement, application, notice filing, or report may be made available to the public under such rules as the commissioner prescribes.

Upon request and upon payment of such reasonable charges as the commissioner by rule prescribes, the commissioner shall furnish to any person copies (certified under the commissioner's seal of office if requested) of any entry in the register or any document which is a matter of public record. In any proceeding or prosecution under this part, any copy so certified is prima facie evidence of the contents of the entry or document certified.

The commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, may honor requests from interested persons for interpretative opinions pertaining to this part.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 17; T.C.A., § 48-16-117; Acts 1997, ch. 164, § 6; T.C.A., § 48-2-117; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 41.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-117 was transferred to § 48-1-117 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

48-1-118. Investigations and subpoenas.

The commissioner, in the commissioner's discretion, may:

Make such public or private investigations within or outside of this state as the commissioner deems necessary to determine whether or not any person has violated or is about to violate any provision of this part or any rule, regulation, or order hereunder, or to aid in the enforcement of this part, or in the prescribing of rules hereunder;

Require or permit any person to file a statement in writing, under oath or otherwise as the commissioner determines, as to all the facts and circumstances concerning the matter to be investigated; and

Publish information concerning any violation of this part or any rule or order hereunder.

All investigations conducted under this subsection (a) shall be commenced by an order of the commissioner, specifying the specific provision or provisions of this part which may have been or may be about to be violated and the basis for such investigation. Upon request, such order shall be made available to any person named in such order as being investigated.

For the purpose of conducting any investigation as provided in this section, the commissioner has the power to administer oaths, to call any party to testify under oath at such investigations, to require the attendance of witnesses, the production of books, records, and papers, and to take the depositions of witnesses.

For such purposes, the commissioner is authorized to issue a subpoena for any witness or a subpoena duces tecum to compel the production of any books, records or papers. These subpoenas may be served by registered mail, return receipt requested, to the addressee's business mailing address, or by such personnel of the department of commerce and insurance as the commissioner may designate, or shall be directed for service to the sheriff of the county where such witness resides or is found or where such person in custody of any books, records, or papers resides or is found.

In case of a refusal to obey a subpoena issued to any person under subsection (b), any circuit or chancery court of this state within the jurisdiction in which the person refusing to obey the subpoena is found or resides may issue to such person, upon application by the commissioner, an order requiring such person to appear before the court to show cause why the person should not be held in contempt for refusal to obey the subpoena. Failure to obey a subpoena may be punished by the court as a contempt of court.

The commissioner may, with the written approval of the attorney general and reporter, issue to any person who has been or may be called to a hearing or other proceeding under this part, a written order requiring the individual to give testimony or provide other information which the person refuses to give or provide on the basis of the person's privilege against self-incrimination. Such order shall be issued only if the commissioner finds that:

The testimony or other information from such individual may be in the public interest; and

Such individual has refused or is likely to refuse to testify or provide other information on the basis of the individual's privilege against self-incrimination.

Whenever any witness refuses, on the basis of the witness's privilege against self-incrimination, to testify or provide other information at any hearing or other proceeding under this part, and the person presiding over the proceeding delivers to the witness a written order issued under subdivision (d)(1), the witness may not refuse to comply with the order on the basis of the witness's privilege against self-incrimination; but no testimony or other information compelled under the order as to which the witness could validly assert the privilege against self-incrimination (or any information directly or indirectly derived from such testimony or other information) may be used against the witness in any criminal case, except a prosecution for perjury, false swearing, giving a false statement to the commissioner pursuant to this part, or otherwise failing to comply with the order.

In the case of any investigation conducted under this section, the commissioner may hold hearings, or may appoint an investigative agent to conduct such hearings who shall have the same powers and authority in conducting such hearings as are in this section granted to the commissioner. The agent shall be possessed of such qualifications as the commissioner may require.

A transcript of the testimony and evidence and objections resulting from such hearings shall be taken, unless waived in writing by all parties present at such hearings. Copies of such transcript shall be available to all parties present at the hearing (to the extent of their testimony if a private hearing) upon payment of a reasonable fee for reproducing such transcript.

All recommendations of the investigative agent shall be advisory only and shall not have the effect of an order of the commissioner.

In any case where hearings are conducted by an investigative agent, such agent shall submit to the commissioner a written report which shall include a transcript of the testimony in evidence (if requested by the commissioner), findings of fact, and a recommendation of the action to be taken by the commissioner with reasons therefor. The recommendation of such agent shall be approved, modified, or disapproved by the commissioner. The commissioner may direct an investigative agent to take additional testimony or permit the introduction of further documentary evidence.

In addition to any other hearings and investigations which the commissioner is authorized or required by this part to conduct, the commissioner is also authorized to hold general investigative hearings on the commissioner's own motion with respect to any matter under this part. A general investigative hearing as provided for herein may be conducted by any person designated by the commissioner for that purpose and may, but need not be, transcribed by the commissioner or by any other interested party. No formal action may be taken as a result of such investigative hearing, but the commissioner may take such action as the commissioner deems appropriate, based on the information developed in the hearing and on any other information which the commissioner may have.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 18; 1981, ch. 459, § 2; T.C.A., § 48-16-118; T.C.A., § 48-2-118.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-118 was transferred to § 48-1-118 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

48-1-119. Injunctions.

Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any person has engaged or is about to engage in any act or practice constituting a violation of any provision of this part or any rule or order hereunder, the commissioner may, in the commissioner's discretion, bring an action in the chancery court of any county in this state to enjoin the acts or practices and to enforce compliance with this part or any rule or order hereunder.

Upon a proper showing, a permanent or temporary injunction, restraining order, writ of mandamus, disgorgement, or other proper equitable relief shall be granted and a receiver or conservator may be appointed for the defendant or the defendant's assets.

The court may not require the commissioner to post a bond.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 19; T.C.A., § 48-16-119; T.C.A., § 48-2-119.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-119 was transferred to § 48-1-119 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

48-1-120. Judicial review.

Any person aggrieved by a final order of the commissioner under this part may obtain judicial review of the order in the chancery court of Davidson County by proceedings in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 20; T.C.A., § 48-16-120; T.C.A., § 48-2-120.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-120 was transferred to § 48-1-120 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

48-1-121. Fraudulent acts or devices.

It is unlawful for any person, in connection with the offer, sale or purchase of any security in this state, directly or indirectly, to:

Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud;

Make any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading; or

Engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon any person.

It is unlawful for any person who receives any consideration from another person primarily for advising the other person as to the value of securities or their purchase or sale, whether through the issuance of analyses or reports or otherwise, in this state, to:

Employ any device, scheme, or artifice to defraud the other person;

Engage in any act, practice, or course of business which operates or would operate as a fraud or deceit upon the other person; or

Take or have custody of any securities or funds of any client except as the commissioner may by rule permit or unless the person is licensed as a broker-dealer under this part.

It is unlawful for any person to make or cause to be made, in any document filed with the commissioner or in any proceeding under this part, any untrue statement of a material fact or to omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements made, in the light of the circumstances under which they are made, not misleading.

The commissioner may, after notice and opportunity for a hearing under the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, impose a civil penalty against any person found to be in violation of this section, or any rule or order adopted or issued under this section, in an amount not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation, or in an amount not to exceed twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) per violation if an individual who is a designated adult is a victim.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 21; T.C.A., § 48-16-121; Acts 1996, ch. 1072, § 9; 1997, ch. 164, § 7; 2010, ch. 829, § 4; T.C.A., § 48-2-121; Acts 2017, ch. 424, § 42.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-121 was transferred to § 48-1-121 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Law Reviews.

SEC Injunctions, 68 Tenn. L. Rev. 427 (2001).

48-1-122. Civil liabilities.

Any person who:

Sells a security in violation of §§ 48-1-104 — 48-1-109, 48-1-110(f), or of any condition imposed under § 48-1-107(e), or any rule, or order under this part of which the person has notice; or

Sells a security in violation of § 48-1-121(a) (the purchaser not knowing of the violation of § 48-1-121(a), and who does not carry the burden of proof of showing that the person did not know and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known of the violation of § 48-1-121(a));

shall be liable to the person purchasing the security from the seller to recover the consideration paid for the security, together with interest at the legal rate from the date of payment, less the amount of any income received on the security, upon the tender of the security, or, if the purchaser no longer owns the security, the amount that would be recoverable upon a tender, less the value of the security when the purchaser disposed of it and interest at the legal rate from the date of disposition.

Tender shall require only notice of willingness to exchange the security for the amount specified.

Any notice may be given by service as in civil actions or by certified mail addressed to the last known address of the person liable.

Any person who purchases a security in violation of § 48-1-121(a) (the seller not knowing of the violation of § 48-1-121(a), and who does not carry the burden of proof of showing that the purchaser did not know and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known of the violation of § 48-1-121(a)) shall be liable to the person selling the security to the purchaser to return the security, plus any income received by the purchaser thereon, upon tender of the consideration received, or, if the purchaser no longer owns the security, the excess of the value of the security when the purchaser no longer owns the security, the excess of the value of the security when the purchaser disposed of it, plus interest at the legal rate from the date of disposition, over the consideration paid for the security.

Tender requires only notice of willingness to pay the amount specified in exchange for the security.

Any notice may be given by service as in civil actions or by certified mail to the last known address of the person liable.

Any person who willfully engages in any act or conduct which violates § 48-1-121 shall be liable to any other person (not knowing that any such conduct constituted a violation of § 48-1-121) who purchases or sells any security at a price which was affected by the act or conduct for the damages sustained as a result of such act or conduct unless the person sued shall prove that the person sued acted in good faith and did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, that such act or conduct violated § 48-1-121.

Damages shall be the difference between the price at which the other person purchased or sold securities and the market value which the securities would have had at the time of the other person's purchase or sale in the absence of the act or conduct plus interest at the legal rate.

Any person who shall make or cause to be made any statement in any application, report, or document filed pursuant to this part or any rule or order hereunder or any undertaking contained in a registration statement hereunder, or in any advice given in such person's capacity as an investment adviser, which statement was at the time and in the light of the circumstances under which it was made false or misleading with respect to any material fact, shall be liable to any person (not knowing that any such statement was false or misleading) who, in reliance upon such statement, shall have purchased or sold a security at a price which was affected by such statement, for damages (calculated as provided in subsections (a) and (b)) caused by such reliance, unless the person sued shall prove that the person sued acted in good faith and had no knowledge that such statement was false or misleading and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known that such statement was false or misleading.

A person seeking to enforce any liability under this section may sue either at law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction.

In any such suit under this section, the court may, in its discretion, require an undertaking for the payment of the costs of such suit, and assess reasonable costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees, against either party litigant.

Every person who directly or indirectly controls a person liable under this section, every partner, principal executive officer, or director of such person, every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, every employee of such person who materially aids in the act or transaction constituting the violation, and every broker-dealer or agent who materially aids in the act or transaction constituting the violation, are also liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as such person, unless the person who would be liable under this subsection (g) proves that the person who would be liable did not know, and in the exercise of reasonable care could not have known, of the existence of the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist. There is contribution as in cases of contract among the several persons so liable.

No action shall be maintained under this section unless commenced before the expiration of five (5) years after the act or transaction constituting the violation or the expiration of two (2) years after the discovery of the facts constituting the violation, or after such discovery should have been made by the exercise of reasonable diligence, whichever first expires.

Any condition, stipulation, or provision binding any person acquiring any security to waive compliance with any provision of this part or any rule or order hereunder is void.

The rights and remedies under this part are in addition to any other rights or remedies that may exist at law or in equity.

The legal rate of interest shall be that as provided by § 47-14-121.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 22; 1981, ch. 459, §§ 3, 4; T.C.A., § 48-16-122; Acts 1996, ch. 1072, §§ 4, 5; 2003, ch. 100, §§ 1, 2; T.C.A., § 48-2-122.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-122 was transferred to § 48-1-122 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Acts 2003, ch. 100, § 3 provided that the amendment to subsection (h) shall apply to all proceedings addressed by this part that are commenced on or after May 7, 2003.

Law Reviews.

Securities Issuer Liability for Third Party Misstatements: Refining the Entanglement Standard see 53 Vand. L. Rev. 947 (2000).

48-1-123. Criminal prosecution.

Any person who willfully violates any provision of this part or who willfully violates any rule or order under this part commits a Class D felony. No person may be imprisoned for the violation of any rule or order if the person proves that the person had no actual knowledge of the rule or order.

The commissioner may refer such evidence as is available concerning violations of this part or of any rule or order hereunder to the attorney general and reporter, or the district attorney general in the county where the violation was committed, either of whom may, with or without such a reference, institute the appropriate criminal proceedings under this part.

Nothing in this part limits the power of this state to punish any person for any conduct which constitutes a crime by statute or at common law.

Acts 1980, ch. 866, § 23; T.C.A., § 48-16-123; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 42; 1996, ch. 1072, § 3; T.C.A., § 48-2-123.

Code Commission Notes.

Former § 48-2-123 was transferred to § 48-1-123 by the code commission in 2012.

Compiler's Notes. The Securities Law of 1955, formerly codified as §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653, was repealed by Acts 1980, ch. 886, § 27. However, the section also contained a savings provision referring to former §§ 48-1601 — 48-1653 which read:

“(b) Prior law exclusively governs all suits, actions, prosecutions, or proceedings which are pending or may be initiated on the basis of facts or circumstances occurring before the effective date of this Act, except that no civil suit or action may be maintained to enforce any liability under prior law unless brought within any period of limitation which applied when the cause of action accrued and in any event within two years after the effective date of this Act.

“(c) All effective registrations under prior law, all administrative orders relating to such registrations, and all conditions imposed upon such registrations remain in effect so long as they would have remained in effect if this Act had not been passed. They are considered to have been filed, entered, or imposed under this Act, but are governed by prior law.

“(d) Prior law applies in respect of any sale made within one year after the effective date of this Act pursuant to an offering exempt under prior law which offering was begun in good faith before such effective date.

“(e) Judicial review of all administrative orders as to which review proceedings have not been instituted by the effective date of this Act are governed by Section 20, except that no review proceeding may be instituted unless the petition is filed within any period of limitation which applied to a review proceeding when the order was entered and in any event within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.”

The effective date of the Act was July 2, 1980.

Cross-References. Penalty for Class D felony, § 40-35-111.